District of Columbia statutes.
9-703

Lease of space or property.

The Administrator is empowered to lease, upon such terms as he may deem proper, space or property within or upon the airport for purposes essential or appropriate to the operation of the airport.

June 29, 1940, 54 Stat. 687, ch. 444, § 3
1981 Ed., § 7-1103.
1973 Ed., § 7-1303.